Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.090

Examination of persons with disabilities.

Any person taking any written examination prescribed or authorized by law, for a license or permit to practice any trade, occupation, or profession, who, because of any disability, is unable to write the examination himself or herself, may dictate it to and have it written or typed by another, to the same effect as though the examination were written out by himself or herself. Any expense connected therewith shall be borne by the person taking the examination.

[ 2020 c 274 s 22; 2009 c 549 s 5109; 1965 c 8 s 43.24.090. Prior: 1947 c 143 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8265-20.]